Utah statutes.
48-2a-110.   Effect of conversion.
(1)  Upon the filing with the division of the articles of conversion and the
certificate of limited partnership or, if applicable, upon the future
effective date or time of the articles of conversion and the certificate of
limited partnership, the subject entity shall be converted into a domestic
limited partnership and the limited partnership shall thereafter be subject to
all of the provisions of this chapter, except that, notwithstanding Section
48-2a-201, the existence of the limited partnership shall be considered to
have commenced on the date the subject entity commenced its existence in the
jurisdiction in which the subject entity was first created, formed,
incorporated, or otherwise came into being.
(2)  The conversion of any subject entity into a domestic limited partnership
shall not affect any obligations or liabilities of the subject entity incurred
prior to its conversion to a domestic limited partnership or the personal
liability of any person incurred prior to the conversion.
(3)  When a conversion becomes effective under this section, for all purposes
of the laws of this state, all of the rights, privileges, and powers of the
subject entity that has converted, and all property, real, personal, and
mixed, and all debts due to the subject entity, as well as all other things
and causes of action belonging to the subject entity remain vested in the
domestic limited partnership to which the subject entity has converted and
shall be the property of the domestic limited partnership and the title to any
real property vested by deed or otherwise in the subject entity shall not
revert or be in any way impaired by reason of this chapter or of the
conversion, but all rights of creditors and all liens upon any property of the
subject entity shall be preserved unimpaired, and all debts, liabilities, and
duties of the subject entity that has converted shall remain attached to the
domestic limited partnership to which the subject entity has converted and may
be enforced against it to the same extent as if those debts, liabilities, and
duties had been incurred or contracted by it in its capacity as a domestic
limited partnership.
(4)  Unless otherwise agreed, or as required under applicable law of another
jurisdiction, the converting subject entity shall not be required to wind up
its affairs or pay its liabilities or distribute its assets, and the
conversion shall not constitute a dissolution of the subject entity but shall
constitute a continuation of the existence of the converting subject entity in
the form of a domestic limited partnership.  When any subject entity has been
converted to a domestic limited partnership pursuant to this part, the
domestic limited partnership shall thereafter, for all purposes of the laws of
this state, be considered to be the same entity as the converting subject
entity.
